Vermont statutes. Title 13 Crimes and Criminal Procedure
Chapter 61. Maiming

§ 2701.
Definition of and penalty for maiming.

Any person with malicious intent to maim or disfigure, who shall cut out or maim the tongue, put out or destroy an eye, cut or tear off an ear, cut, slit, or mutilate the nose or lip, or cut or disable a limb or member of another person, and any person privy to such intent who shall be present aiding in the commission of such offense shall be imprisoned for life or for not less than seven years.

HISTORY:

Amended 1971, No. 199 (Adj. Sess.), § 15.